Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.160

Conditional release—Reports.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

When a conditionally released person is required by the terms of his or her conditional release to report to a physician, department of corrections community corrections officer, or medical or mental health practitioner on a regular or periodic basis, the physician, department of corrections community corrections officer, medical or mental health practitioner, or other such person shall monthly, for the first six months after release and semiannually thereafter, or as otherwise directed by the court, submit to the court, the secretary, the institution from which released, and to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the person was committed, a report stating whether the person is adhering to the terms and conditions of his or her conditional release, and detailing any arrests or criminal charges filed and any significant change in the person's mental health condition or other circumstances.

[ 2010 c 263 s 6; 1993 c 31 s 7; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 16.]